Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-137
Gosper.

The county of Gosper is bounded as follows: On the east by Phelps County, on the south by Furnas County, on the west by Frontier County, on the north by Dawson County.

Laws 1881, c. 36, p. 215;

R.S.1913, § 850;

C.S.1922, § 752;

C.S.1929, § 25-139;

R.S.1943, § 22-137.